Washington statutes.
RCW 8.08.100

Mode of appropriation.

The right of eminent domain for the purposes intended in RCW 8.08.090 through 8.08.130 is hereby extended to all counties in this state and every such county for any purpose of condemnation, appropriation or disposition such as is mentioned in RCW 8.08.090 is hereby authorized and empowered to condemn and appropriate all necessary lands and all rights, properties and interests in or appurtenant to land under the same procedure as is or shall be provided by the laws of this state for the case of any similar condemnation or appropriation by other corporations.

[ 1895 c 2 s 3; RRS s 903.]